Washington statutes.
RCW 35.21.770

Members of legislative bodies authorized to serve as volunteer firefighters, volunteer ambulance personnel, or reserve law enforcement officers.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the legislative body of any city or town, by resolution adopted by a two-thirds vote of the full legislative body, may authorize any of its members to serve as volunteer firefighters, volunteer ambulance personnel, or reserve law enforcement officers, or two or more of such positions, and to receive the same compensation, insurance, and other benefits as are applicable to other volunteer firefighters, volunteer ambulance personnel, or reserve law enforcement officers employed by the city or town.

[ 1997 c 65 s 1; 1993 c 303 s 1; 1974 ex.s. c 60 s 1.]